Massachusetts, session 194th, H4089.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 11 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, section 
17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, or any general or special law to the contrary, the 
licensing authority in the town of Milton may grant five additional licenses for the sale of all 
alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section 12 of said chapter 138. 
(b) A license granted pursuant to this act shall only be exercised in the dining room of a 
common victualler licensed to conduct a restaurant and other such public rooms or areas as may 
be deemed reasonable and appropriate by the licensing authority as certified in writing. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.